District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-713

Duties of Director of Department of Human Services.

Repealed.

History

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 287, Pub. L. 85-94, § 13
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 33(f)(3), 33 DCR 6710
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-313.
1973 Ed., § 30-313.